Hawaii statutes.
§36-5 Responsibility for drafts on
treasury. Except as otherwise provided, the head of each department shall
be responsible for the correctness of all drafts or orders drawn by him upon
the treasury, in pursuance of appropriations, and for the proper disbursements
of all appropriations for his department. The responsibility of the director
of finance, in these cases, shall be limited to the payment of the aggregate
amount of appropriations made by the legislature. [CC 1859, §477; RL 1925,
§1251; RL 1935, §2210; RL 1945, §5811; RL 1955, §132-11; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §36-5]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next